Arizona, session 57th-2nd-regular, SB1125.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Arizona: Section 1. Title 8, chapter 4, article 1, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended by adding section 8-469.03, to read: START_STATUTE8-469.03. Indian tribes; memorandum of understanding The department shall make efforts on an annual basis to enter into a memorandum of understanding with each indian tribe located in this state that does not have a current memorandum of understanding with the department.  the memorandum of understanding must: 1. Require tHE department to share best practices, policies, training materials and operational standards relating to the administration of the department, including ALL OF THE FOLLOWING: (a) InTAKE. (b) iNVESTIGATIONS. (c) pLACEMENT OF CHILDREN. (d) CASE MANAGEMENT. (e) SERVICE COORDINATION. 2. iDENTIFy A DESIGNATED DEPARTMENT TRIBAL LIAISON WHO IS ASSIGNED TO THE SPECIFIC TRIBE THAT IS A PARTY TO THE MEMORANDUM OF UNDERSTANDING AND WHO WILL COORDINATE COMMUNICATION WITH THE TRIBE, PROVIDE TECHNICAL ASSISTANCE TO THE TRIBE AND SUPPORT COLLABORATION WITH THE TRIBE ON CHILD WELFARE MATTERS. 3. Establish a PROCESS THAT ALLOWS THE TRIBE THAT IS A PARTY TO THE MEMORANDUM OF UNDERSTANDING to ACCESS REGULATORY ACTIONS, LICENSING ACTIONS, INVESTIGATIONS AND ENFORCEMENT MEASURES TAKEN BY THE DEPARTMENT AGAINST ANY DEPARTMENT-LICENSED GROUP HOME IN WHICH A CHILD WHO IS A MEMBER OF THE TRIBE IS PLACED.  tHE TRIBE SHALL HAVE ACCESS TO ALL OF THE FOLLOWING: (a) cORRECTIVE ACTION PLANS. (b) lICENSING SANCTIONS OR SUSPENSIONS. (c) sUBSTANTIATED HEALTH AND SAFETY VIOLATIONS. (d) aNY OTHER REGULATORY ACTIONS RELATED TO CHILD WELFARE, SAFETY OR CARE STANDARDS. END_STATUTE APPROVED BY THE GOVERNOR APRIL 2, 2026. FILED IN THE OFFICE OF THE SECRETARY OF STATE APRIL 2, 2026.